District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-215.09a

Advance, partial, or progress payments.

Repealed.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 12, 23 DCR 9532b
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 306, 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 117(c), 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 1-1150.
1973 Ed., § 1-860.